Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 4

Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act

62-5-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act.”

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9; 15 Tenn. Juris., §§ 4, 16.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

Sellers of pre-need funeral contracts, which are funded by a trust or trusts established by the seller, may not combine their individual pre-need trusts with other Tennessee sellers of pre-need funeral contracts to create a single statewide funeral trust. OAG 13-42, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (6/4/13).

62-5-402. Scope of part.

This part governs the qualifications and procedures for registration and general regulatory requirements for the sale of prepaid funeral benefits in this state.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-403. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Cash advance item” means any item obtained from a third party and paid for by the funeral provider on the purchaser's behalf. Cash advance items may include, but are not limited to, sales tax, certified copies of death certificates, clergy honoraria, flowers, musicians or singers, obituary notices and gratuities;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee;

“Department” means the department of commerce and insurance;

“Funeral merchandise”:

Means merchandise, whether sold by a funeral establishment, cemetery company, or any other individual, partnership, company, corporation, or association, intended for use in the final disposition of a dead human body;

Includes caskets and containers designed to be used in the grave around the casket or around cremated remains, commonly known as urns, urn vaults, outer burial containers, burial vaults, grave boxes, and grave liners; and

Does not include cemetery merchandise as defined in § 46-1-102;

“Guaranteed pre-need funeral contract” means the pre-need seller, where the contract has been funded in accordance with its terms, shall furnish at the time of death of the contract beneficiary, at no additional charge to the next of kin, the estate of the deceased, or other individual or entity responsible for the funeral, the merchandise and services selected, or the equivalent if the specific merchandise is not readily available, in the pre-need funeral contract. The only adjustment in the charge to the next of kin, the estate of the deceased or other individual or entity responsible for the funeral shall be for cash advance items. The pre-need seller shall be obligated to deliver the agreed upon merchandise and services under a fully funded pre-need funeral contract for the available funding at the time of death of the contract beneficiary. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the pre-need seller from receiving the available funding up to the seller's current retail price for the merchandise and services at the time of death of the contract beneficiary;

“Insurance company” means any corporation, limited liability company, association, partnership, society, order, individual or aggregation of individuals engaging in or proposing or attempting to engage as principals in any kind of insurance business, including the exchanging of reciprocal contracts between individuals, partnerships, and corporations;

“Nonguaranteed pre-need funeral contract” means, in addition to any cash advance items, the pre-need seller may charge the individual or entity responsible for the funeral any difference between the available funding and the seller's current retail price at the time of death of the contract beneficiary for the merchandise and services selected in the pre-need funeral contract;

“Prearrangement insurance policy” means a life insurance policy, annuity contract, or other insurance contract, or any series of contracts or agreements in any form or manner, issued by an insurance company, that, whether by assignment or otherwise, funds a pre-need funeral contract, the insured or annuitant being the person for whose funeral service the funds were paid;

“Pre-need funeral contract” means any agreement, contract or plan requiring the payment of money in advance, whether in a lump sum or installments and whether funded by a pre-need funeral trust or prearrangement insurance policy or combination of a pre-need funeral trust and a prearrangement insurance policy, that is made or entered into with any person, association, partnership, firm or corporation for the final disposition of a dead human body, for funeral or burial services or for the furnishing of personal property or funeral or burial merchandise, wherein the use of the personal property or the funeral or burial merchandise or the furnishing of professional services by a funeral director or embalmer is not immediately required;

Except as otherwise provided in § 62-5-406, “pre-need funeral contract” does not mean the furnishing of cemetery merchandise and services otherwise regulated under title 46, chapter 1, part 2;

“Pre-need funeral contract” does not include a travel protection agreement for the coordination and arranging of all professional services related to the preparation for the purpose of transportation and subsequent transportation of a dead human body;

“Pre-need funeral contract beneficiary” means the person upon whose death the pre-need funeral contract will be performed. This person may also be the purchaser of the pre-need funeral contract;

“Pre-need funeral funds” means all payments of cash, or its equivalent, made to a pre-need seller or pre-need sales agent upon any pre-need funeral contract;

“Pre-need funeral trust” means funds set aside in a trust account held by a trustee to provide for a pre-need funeral contract;

“Pre-need sales agent” means an individual who has applied for and has been granted, or who engages in conduct requiring, registration to sell pre-need funeral contracts on behalf of a pre-need seller pursuant to this part;

“Pre-need seller” means a funeral establishment or other individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, or association that has applied for and has been granted, or that engages in conduct requiring, registration to sell pre-need funeral contracts pursuant to this part; and

“Trustee” means a state or national bank, federally chartered savings and loan association, state chartered trust company, or, in the reasonable discretion of the commissioner upon the terms and conditions that the commissioner may require, a securities brokerage firm licensed and in good standing with appropriate state and federal regulatory authorities;

Prior to July 1, 2011, “trustee” may also mean a certified public accountant who the commissioner determines meets all of the following requirements:

The certified public accountant has served during the 2007 calendar year as the trustee for a trust account established pursuant to this part;

The certified public accountant is covered by errors and omissions liability insurance in an amount equal to or greater than the amount held in trust; and

The certified public accountant has complied with all previous reporting requirements required by statute and rules of the commissioner;

On or after July 1, 2011, every trustee of every trust account shall be a trustee as set forth in subdivision (15)(A).

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 4; 2008, ch. 857, § 1; 2009, ch. 279, §§ 1-3; 2016, ch. 911, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 623, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Acts 2018, ch. 623, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after April 2, 2018.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

A plan offered for a prepaid, nonrefundable fee to arrange the professional transport of a dead human body from any site of death to a licensed funeral provider – but only if the contract beneficiary’s future death occurs more than seventy-five miles away from home – qualifies as a “pre-need funeral contract” under the Tennessee Prepaid Funeral Benefits Act. If the plan described above is sold in conjunction with another contract that meets the definition of a “pre-need funeral contract,” the plan still qualifies as a “pre-need funeral contract” under the Act. OAG 17-07, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (2/3/2017).

62-5-404. Registration requirement.

No individual may offer or sell pre-need funeral contracts without first registering with the commissioner as a pre-need sales agent. No individual may sell, solicit or negotiate prearrangement insurance policies without first registering with the commissioner as a pre-need sales agent and obtaining an insurance producer license pursuant to title 56, chapter 6, part 1.

No funeral establishment or other individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, or association may offer or sell pre-need funeral contracts without first registering with the commissioner as a pre-need seller. A funeral establishment or other individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, or association with more than one (1) physical location in this state shall obtain a separate registration for each physical location where it acts as a pre-need seller.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-405. Procedure for registration.

In order to obtain a pre-need seller registration or a pre-need sales agent registration, an individual, funeral establishment or other individual, firm, partnership, company, corporation, or association shall:

File an application with the department on a form prescribed by the commissioner; and

Pay a nonrefundable filing fee in an amount set by the commissioner.

A pre-need seller registration shall be valid only at the address provided in the application or at a new address approved by the commissioner.

All registrations issued under this part shall be valid for two (2) years.

All registrations become invalid unless renewed.

The commissioner shall send a renewal notice and the renewal of a registration may be effected at any time during the two (2) months preceding the date of expiration upon submission of an application to the commissioner on the prescribed form, accompanied by a renewal fee as set by the commissioner.

No later than seventy-five (75) days after the end of the pre-need seller's fiscal year, pre-need sellers and trustees shall file an annual report with the commissioner on forms prescribed by the commissioner. The report shall include a summary of the information contained in the accounts, books, and records required to be kept pursuant to rules promulgated by the commissioner, and other information as the commissioner may reasonably require. An additional report shall not be required based on the establishment of trusts pursuant to this title and title 46. In such instance, only one (1) report shall be required.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 6; 2016, ch. 911, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 5 Tenn. Juris., Cemeteries, § 9.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-406. Filing of pre-need funeral contract — Contract form requirements — Revocable and irrevocable contracts.

No pre-need funeral contract shall be offered in this state until a copy of the contract has been issued by the commissioner for general use.

If no contract has been issued by the commissioner pursuant to subdivision (a)(1), then no pre-need funeral contract shall be offered in this state until a copy of the contract has been filed with and approved by the commissioner. If the commissioner does not disapprove the contract within sixty (60) days after receipt of the request for approval, the contract shall be deemed approved. The commissioner may disapprove a previously approved pre-need funeral contract if the pre-need funeral contract violates this section upon giving notice and an opportunity for a hearing to the pre-need seller.

Each pre-need contract form shall:

Be written in clear and understandable language printed in an easy-to-read type size and style;

Contain space to include the name, address, telephone number, and registration number of the pre-need seller obligated to provide the services under the contract terms, and all the information must be completed before the contract is signed by the purchaser;

Clearly identify whether the contract is a guaranteed pre-need funeral contract or a non-guaranteed pre-need funeral contract; and

If the contract is funded by a pre-need funeral trust, the pre-need funeral contract shall state whether the pre-need funeral trust it establishes is revocable or irrevocable.

If the pre-need funeral trust is irrevocable, the pre-need funeral contract shall state on its face and in bold type the following words: THE PRE-NEED FUNERAL TRUST ACCOUNT ESTABLISHED BY THIS CONTRACT IS IRREVOCABLE, AND THE FUNDS PAID HEREUNDER ARE NOT REFUNDABLE. ACCUMULATED TRUST PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST ARE FREELY TRANSFERABLE TO SATISFY FUNERAL EXPENSES AT ANY LICENSED FUNERAL ESTABLISHMENT AS PROVIDED BY LAW.

If the pre-need funeral trust is revocable, the purchaser of the merchandise or services under the agreement, contract or plan shall be entitled to receive any or all of the payments made and any earnings or interest on the payments, less any applicable fees and expenses permitted by this part, upon demand in writing on the pre-need seller and the trustee. Absent gross negligence or willful misconduct by the trustee, payment by the trustee of the amount held in trust, less any applicable fees and expenses permitted by this part, shall relieve the trustee of further liability to the purchaser in connection with the trust.

No modification of the form, terms, or conditions of the pre-need contract may be made without the prior written approval of the commissioner.

No pre-need funeral contract shall provide for the funeral establishment, pre-need seller, or pre-need sales agent to receive any benefits from a prearrangement insurance policy or moneys from a pre-need funeral trust other than the amount of payment for the merchandise and services provided by the funeral establishment. This subsection (d) shall not prohibit the payment of commissions authorized to be paid under title 56, chapter 6.

This section shall apply only to pre-need funeral contracts executed subsequent to January 1, 2008.

A pre-need seller that is a cemetery company may offer a pre-need funeral contract that covers cemetery merchandise as defined in § 46-1-102, or a pre-need funeral contract that covers both funeral merchandise and cemetery merchandise, on a contract issued by the commissioner or, if the commissioner has not issued a contract, on a contract approved by the commissioner. The pre-need seller that is a cemetery company shall comply with the requirements provided in title 46, chapter 1, for selling cemetery merchandise.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 7; 2008, ch. 1065, § 1; 2016, ch. 911, §§ 3, 4.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

62-5-407. Pre-need funeral contracts funded by trusts.

Every pre-need seller engaged in the business of selling pre-need funeral contracts funded by a trust shall establish a pre-need funeral trust fund. The trust fund shall be established by executing a written trust agreement with a trustee; provided, that a pre-need seller may change the trustee of its trust fund by providing written notice to the commissioner no later than thirty (30) days prior to the change, along with evidence sufficient to the commissioner that the trustee will be able to comply with the requirements of this part. If the commissioner determines that the evidence submitted is insufficient to ensure that the trustee will be able to comply with the requirements of this part, the commissioner may refuse to allow the pre-need seller to change the trustee. If the commissioner does not object to the change of trustee within sixty (60) calendar days of receiving a request, the current trustee shall have not less than ninety (90) calendar days from the date it receives notice of the proposed change to transfer all trust assets related to the pre-need funeral contracts issued by the pre-need seller held by the trustee to the successor trustee. As used in this section, “trustee” means a savings and loan association, bank, savings bank, credit union, or trust company organized under the laws of any state or organized under the laws of the United States.

If the pre-need funeral contract purchaser chooses to fund the pre-need funeral contract by a trust deposit or deposits, the pre-need seller shall deposit all funds with the trustee, to be held in trust, within fifteen (15) calendar days of receipt. The pre-need seller, at the time of making the deposit, shall furnish to the trustee the name of each pre-need funeral contract beneficiary and the amount of payment on each for which the deposit is being made.

The trustee may establish:

A separate trust fund for each pre-need funeral contract;

A single trust fund for all pre-need funeral contracts issued by a pre-need seller; or

A single trust fund for all pre-need funeral contracts issued by multiple pre-need sellers.

For trusts established pursuant to subdivisions (b)(2)(A) and (b)(2)(B), the trust accounts must be carried in the name of the pre-need seller and the pre-need seller must be based in this state.

A trustee managing a trust established pursuant to this section shall manage the trust in accordance with the Tennessee Uniform Prudent Investor Act of 2002, compiled in title 35, chapter 14. However, § 35-14-103(b) does not apply to trusts, or trustees managing a trust, established pursuant to this section.

Accounting records for trusts established pursuant to this section must be established and maintained for each individual pre-need funeral contract beneficiary showing the amounts deposited and invested, and interest, dividends, increases, and accretions earned.

A trustee managing a trust established pursuant to this section shall:

Provide a semiannual financial report concerning the trust to the department in a manner determined appropriate by the department by rule; and

Make accounting records for the trust available to the comptroller of the treasury and the department, upon request, for review and audit.

If the trustee uses a board for the management of the trust established pursuant to this section, then the trustee shall maintain insurance on behalf of each board member against liability asserted against or incurred by the board member in that capacity.

Funds deposited in trust under a pre-need funeral contract may, with the written permission of the pre-need funeral contract purchaser and written approval of the commissioner, be withdrawn by the trustee and used to purchase a prearrangement insurance policy. The trustee shall disclose, in writing, the terms of the prearrangement insurance policy to the pre-need funeral contract purchaser. Except as provided in this subsection (c), no funds deposited in trust with a trustee pursuant to this section shall be withdrawn by the trustee to purchase a prearrangement insurance policy.

No pre-need seller, affiliate of a pre-need seller, or any person directly or indirectly engaged in the burial, funeral home, or cemetery business may act as trustee for any pre-need funeral trust. No pre-need seller, affiliate of a pre-need seller, or any person directly or indirectly engaged in the burial, funeral home, or cemetery business may share in the responsibilities of or direct the actions of the trustee of a pre-need funeral trust fund.

It is unlawful to loan pre-need funeral trust funds to a pre-need seller, an affiliate of a pre-need seller, or any person directly or indirectly engaged in the burial, funeral home, or cemetery business. Furthermore, the pre-need seller's interest in the trust shall not be pledged as collateral for any loans, debts, or liabilities of the pre-need seller and shall not be transferred to any person without the prior written approval from the commissioner and the trustee.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 8; 2016, ch. 911, § 7; 2019, ch. 247, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), deleted “as defined in § 62-5-403” preceding the proviso in the first sentence, inserted “related to the pre-need funeral contracts issued by the pre-need seller” in the third sentence, and added the last sentence; and rewrote (b) which read: “(b) If the pre-need funeral contract purchaser chooses to fund the pre-need funeral contract by a trust deposit or deposits, the pre-need seller shall deposit all funds with the trustee, to be held in trust, by the twentieth day of the month following the month of receipt. Upon finding that a pre-need seller has failed to appropriately and timely deposit into any trust, the commissioner may, in addition to or in lieu of any other disciplinary action, require that deposits be made within a shorter time frame, after receipt of the funds, for a period not more than two (2) years after the finding of a violation. The pre-need seller, at the time of making the deposit, shall furnish to the trustee the name of each pre-need funeral contract beneficiary and the amount of payment on each for which the deposit is being made. The trustee may establish a separate trust fund for each pre-need funeral contract or a single trust fund for all pre-need funeral contracts issued by a pre-need seller. The trust accounts shall be carried in the name of the pre-need seller, but accounting records shall be established and maintained for each individual pre-need funeral contract beneficiary showing the amounts deposited and invested, and interest, dividends, increases, and accretions earned.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 247, § 4. July 1, 2019; provided that, for purposes of promulgating rules, the act took effect May 2, 2019.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

Sellers of pre-need funeral contracts, which are funded by a trust or trusts established by the seller, may not combine their individual pre-need trusts with other Tennessee sellers of pre-need funeral contracts to create a single statewide funeral trust. OAG 13-42, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (6/4/13).

62-5-408. Management of funeral contract trust.

Moneys held in a pre-need funeral contract trust shall be held in trust, both as to principal and income earned on the principal, and shall remain intact, except that the trustee shall have the right to use trust fund income to pay applicable taxes and reasonable expenses related to the administration of the trust, including reasonable trustee's fees for services rendered pursuant to the terms of the applicable trust agreement or to others for the preparation of fiduciary tax returns. In no event shall the principal be diminished.

The pre-need seller shall be liable to the trustee and to third parties to the extent that income from the trust is not sufficient to pay the expenses of the trust.

The trustee shall make regular valuations of assets it holds in trust and provide a report of the valuations to the pre-need seller at least annually.

The trustee shall invest the moneys paid and placed in a pre-need funeral contract trust, by exercising the judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing, that persons of prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own affairs, not in regard to speculation, but in regard to the permanent disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the probable safety of their capital.

Except as otherwise provided by this part, all payments made by the purchaser of a pre-need funeral contract shall remain trust funds with a trustee or as paid insurance premiums with an insurance company, as the case may be, until the death of the pre-need funeral contract beneficiary and until full performance of the pre-need funeral contract.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 9; 2016, ch. 911, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

Sellers of pre-need funeral contracts, which are funded by a trust or trusts established by the seller, may not combine their individual pre-need trusts with other Tennessee sellers of pre-need funeral contracts to create a single statewide funeral trust. OAG 13-42, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 44 (6/4/13).

62-5-409. Prearrangement insurance policy.

If the pre-need funeral contract purchaser chooses to fund the contract by a prearrangement insurance policy, the enrollment or application form for the prearrangement insurance policy or certificate shall be submitted to the insurance company by the pre-need sales agent within fifteen (15) calendar days of receipt.

It is unlawful for any life insurance company, fraternal benefit society or other similar company, association or society issuing prearrangement insurance policies, by whatever name they may be called, upon the lives of citizens of this state, to:

Designate, in the policy or otherwise, the person, firm or corporation to conduct the funeral of the insured, or to organize, promote or operate any enterprise or plan, or to enter into any contract with the insured or with any other person, which plan or contract tends to limit or restrict the freedom of choice in the open market of the person or persons having the legal right of the choice regarding contracts, purchases and arrangements with reference to any part of a funeral service for the insured;

Provide in the policy or otherwise that the face amount of the policy, or any loss or indemnity, that may accrue under the policy, shall be payable in anything other than legal tender of the United States and of this state to the beneficiary named in the policy or the legal representative of the insured, and any provision to the contrary shall be null and void;

Enter into any contract with any funeral director, providing that the funeral director shall conduct the funeral of persons insured by the insurance company, fraternal benefit society, or similar company. This subsection (b) shall not be construed to prohibit any beneficiary under a policy from assigning the policy to a funeral establishment of the beneficiary's choice after death of the insured has occurred and liability has accrued; or

Enter into any contract with any citizens of this state, contracting and agreeing to furnish funeral merchandise or services upon the death of any person insured.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to enter into any contract, conditioned to take effect on the death of any person, wherein the person, or the personal representative, heirs or next of kin of the person, is promised any rebate, discount or reduction in price for or on account of funeral merchandise, expenses or services by virtue of the person being issued the policy or certificate, or being designated as beneficiary in the policy, or by virtue of the person entering into the contract or being designated in the policy as the recipient of any such rebate, discount or reduction in price.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, if the insurance company issuing the policy does not offer a funeral trust, or only offers a funeral trust for an additional charge, then the beneficiary or the owner of the policy may irrevocably assign the policy or policy benefits to a funeral establishment; provided, however, that the assignment shall not limit, or be construed as limiting, the ability of the pre-need funeral contract beneficiary or the beneficiary's lawful representative from selecting a different funeral establishment to provide merchandise and services. If a subsequent establishment is designated, then the establishment to which the policy or policy benefits are currently assigned shall, upon written notification, promptly execute any documents necessary to transfer the assignment.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the irrevocable assignment of policy benefits to a trust set up to allow for the distribution of the benefits to the funeral home of the policyholder's choosing.

No assignment of the rights or benefits under a prearrangement insurance policy shall be valid unless it is done on a form approved by the commissioner.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 10; 2008, ch. 1065, § 2; 2009, ch. 279, § 4; 2019, ch. 339, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the beneficiary or the owner of the policy may irrevocably assign the policy” for “the beneficiary may irrevocably assign the policy” in (d).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 339, § 2. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).

The state’s prohibition against the discounting of prearranged funeral contracts is a permissible exercise of state authority, is exempt from federal antitrust laws under the state action immunity doctrine and does not violate any other applicable federal or state law. OAG 12-06, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/13/12).

62-5-410. Death of contract beneficiary — Proof of death — Payments.

Upon the death of the contract beneficiary, the trustee or the insurance company shall pay the funeral establishment or other provider that furnished the services or merchandise only after they have been furnished with a certified copy of the death certificate of the person, or other proof of death acceptable to the trustee or insurance company together with a copy of the statement of funeral merchandise and services, signed by the funeral director or other provider and representative of the contract beneficiary, setting forth that all of the terms and conditions of the pre-need funeral contract have been fully performed by the funeral establishment or other provider.

After payment for the merchandise and services as set forth in the pre-need funeral contract, the trustee or insurance company shall pay any balance remaining in the pre-need funeral trust fund or the prearrangement insurance policy to the purchaser, the purchaser's estate or otherwise named beneficiary.

Acts 2007, ch. 592, § 11.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 4, §§ 62-5-401 — 62-5-409 (Acts 1963, ch. 316, §§ 1-8; 1965, ch. 185, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 137, §§ 1, 2; 1972, ch. 553, § 5; 1981, ch. 121, §§ 1-10; 1981, ch. 416, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 62-528 — 62-535; Acts 1985, ch. 230, §§ 1-9; 1985, ch. 231, § 1, 1986, ch. 825, § 1; 1986, ch. 925, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113; 1992, ch. 922, §§ 8-10; 1996, ch. 958, § 2, 1997, ch. 400, §§ 1, 2), concerning contracts for future services, was repealed by Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 1, effective January 1, 2008.

Cross-References. Cemeteries, title 46.

Fraud as to pre-need sales contracts, § 46-1-308.

Law Reviews.

Preneed Funeral Contracts in Tennessee, 11 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 231.

Attorney General Opinions. Contracts for the sale of burial vaults, OAG 96-017, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (2/15/96).